Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1610
Public employees; order or revocation; filing; effective date.

The order and any revocation thereof, shall be filed with the officer or body whose duty it is to approve and allow claims or vouchers for salaries or wages or the payroll for the agency, public body, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or department of the state and shall be effective on the first day of the month subsequent to such filing. The order shall be in full force and effect from and after its effective date for the balance of the period of employment of the employee unless revoked by the employee.

Laws 1949, c. 132, § 3, p. 347.